Washington statutes.
RCW 3.30.070

Records.

The clerk of each district court shall keep uniform records of each case filed and the proceedings had therein including an accounting for all funds received and disbursed. Financial reporting shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the state auditor. The form of other records may be prescribed by the supreme court.

[ 1995 c 301 s 30; 1971 c 73 s 3; 1961 c 299 s 7.]